Massachusetts, session 194th, H2774.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The definition of Group 4, as set forth in chapter 32, section 3, paragraph (2),
subparagraph (g) of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding thereto the words: employees of the Commonwealth who are employed as
steam fireman/co-generation, third class engineer/co-generation, second class engineer/co-
generation, first class engineer/co-generation and chief engineer/co-generation.
of 1